Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1304
Putting carcass or filthy substance into well, spring, brook, or stream; penalty.

Whoever shall put any dead animal, carcass or part thereof, or other filthy substance, into any well, or into any spring, brook or branch of running water, of which use is made for domestic purposes, shall be guilty of a Class IV misdemeanor.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 288.